Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3801
Purpose of sections.

(1) The purpose of sections 43-3801 to 43-3812 is to protect foreign national minors or minors having multiple nationalities within the State of Nebraska.

(2) The Legislature recognizes that:

(a) Foreign national minors and minors having multiple nationalities are essential to the maintenance of their culture, traditions, and values;

(b) The governments of foreign countries have a duty to care for the interests of their nationals and citizens abroad, particularly foreign national minors and minors having multiple nationalities;

(c) The governments of foreign countries have the right to information and access in all cases involving minors who are children of foreign nationals and minors having multiple nationalities; and

(d) The state should be able to identify foreign national minors and minors having multiple nationalities and their families in order to provide services for them.

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB92, § 1.